 



USG Corporation Announces Leadership Transition | Business Wire


























































USG Corporation Announces Leadership Transition




      James S. Metcalf to Retire as Chairman, President and Chief Executive 
      Officer, Effective October 31, 2016
    

      Jennifer F. Scanlon to Succeed Metcalf as President and Chief Executive 
      Officer
    

      Steven F. Leer to Transition to Non-Executive Chairman of the Board
    





September 23, 2016 08:00 AM Eastern Daylight Time



CHICAGO--(BUSINESS WIRE)--USG Corporation (NYSE:USG), a leading building products company, today 
      announced that James S. Metcalf will retire as chairman of the board, 
      president and chief executive officer (CEO), effective Oct. 31, 2016. 
      Mr. Metcalf has served as president and chief executive officer since 
      January 2011 and as chairman since December 2011.
    


      Jennifer F. Scanlon, executive vice president, president, International 
      and president, L&W Supply Corporation, will succeed Mr. Metcalf as 
      president and CEO upon his retirement and has been appointed a director 
      of the company, effective immediately. Ms. Scanlon will serve as 
      executive vice president and CEO-elect until Nov. 1, 2016. As part of 
      the leadership transition, Steven F. Leer, lead director, will become 
      non-executive chairman of the board, effective Nov. 1, 2016.
    

      “After more than 35 years with the company and more than a decade in 
      senior leadership roles, including almost six years as president and 
      chief executive officer, I believe that it is the right time for me to 
      move on to the next phase of my professional life and for Jenny to guide 
      USG into its next chapter,” said Mr. Metcalf.
    

      Mr. Metcalf continued, “Together we have executed Our Plan to Win, 
      strengthening and growing our core businesses, diversifying our earnings 
      and differentiating our products and services through innovation. With 
      the announced sale of L&W Supply, a strong balance sheet and a deep, 
      experienced team in place, the company is well prepared for this 
      leadership transition. I have full confidence that Jenny and our 
      management team will continue to provide dynamic leadership to create 
      even greater success for our customers, shareholders and employees.”
    

      “Jenny’s background, skills, and expertise give the board full 
      confidence that she is the right person to serve as the next leader of 
      USG,” said Mr. Leer. “Having served in a variety of positions at USG for 
      almost 14 years, Jenny knows the business intimately and brings great 
      insight to this role. She played a leadership role in developing and 
      executing the company’s strategy, including the establishment of the USG 
      Boral joint venture and in returning L&W Supply to profitability. 
      Jenny’s promotion is a reflection of the board’s long-standing 
      succession planning, and we are pleased to have an executive as 
      qualified as Jenny take the reins and lead USG as it moves into its next 
      phase of growth and value creation. We thank Jim for his outstanding 
      leadership of USG over the years, taking over during challenging market 
      conditions, restoring the company to profitability and putting it on 
      sound financial footing.”
    

      “I am excited to take on the role of president and CEO at USG, an 
      outstanding company with innovative products, dedicated employees, clear 
      growth prospects and a solid financial foundation,” said Ms. Scanlon. 
      “These strengths give me great confidence that we are prepared for the 
      next phase of the company’s future. I look forward to working closely 
      with USG’s executive team and employees across the company. Together, we 
      will build on our significant momentum and deliver value for our 
      shareholders, customers, partners and employees.”
    

About Jennifer Scanlon


      Jennifer Scanlon is executive vice president; president, International, 
      president, L&W Supply Corporation, and CEO-elect. She is also a director 
      on the USG Board of Directors and the chairman of the board of USG Boral 
      Building Products. Scanlon leads USG’s international joint ventures 
      across Asia, Australasia and the Middle East. Her previous assignments 
      at USG include vice president and chief information officer and head of 
      corporate strategy. Scanlon joined USG in 2003 as the director of supply 
      chain and customer relationship strategy.
    

      Prior to USG, Scanlon was a senior vice president for Bricker & 
      Associates, Inc., a management consulting firm that specialized in 
      assisting Fortune 500 organizations dramatically increasing profits 
      through operational improvement. She began her career at IBM, serving in 
      various operational and consulting roles.
    

      Scanlon graduated from the University of Notre Dame in 1988 with a B.A. 
      in government and computer applications. She earned an MBA in finance 
      and marketing from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business in 
      1992. Scanlon serves on the boards of the Chicago Council of Global 
      Affairs and of Shore Community Services, Inc. Scanlon is a member of the 
      Economic Club of Chicago and the Executives’ Club of Chicago.
    

About Steven Leer


      Steven Leer has been a director of USG since June 2005, and lead 
      director since January 2012. He serves as chair of the Governance 
      Committee and a member of its Compensation and Organization Committee. 
      Mr. Leer retired as chairman of Arch Coal, Inc. in 2014 after having 
      served in that position since April 2006. He was also the chief 
      executive officer of Arch Coal, Inc. until April 2012. Mr. Leer is a 
      director of Norfolk Southern Corporation, Cenovus Energy Inc. and 
      Parsons Corporation. He is a former director of the Greater St. Louis 
      Area Boy Scouts of America and the National Association of Manufacturers.
    

About USG Corporation


      USG Corporation is a manufacturer and distributor of innovative, 
      high-performance building systems through its United States Gypsum 
      Company, USG Interiors, LLC, and L&W Supply Corporation subsidiaries and 
      its USG Boral Building Products joint venture. Headquartered in Chicago, 
      USG's worldwide operations serve the commercial, residential, and repair 
      and remodel construction markets, enabling our customers to build the 
      outstanding spaces where people live, work and play. USG wall, ceiling, 
      exterior sheathing, flooring underlayment and roofing systems provide 
      leading-edge building solutions, while L&W Supply branch locations 
      efficiently stock and deliver building materials throughout the United 
      States. USG Boral Building Products is a leading plasterboard & ceilings 
      joint venture across Asia, Australasia, and the Middle East. For 
      additional information, visit www.usg.com.
    

Forward Looking Statements


This press release contains forward-looking statements within the 
      meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995 related 
      to management’s expectations about future conditions, including but not 
      limited to, management's expectation about USG’s future performance. 
      Actual business, market or other conditions may differ materially from 
      management’s expectations and, accordingly, may affect our sales and 
      profitability or other results and liquidity. Any forward-looking 
      statements represent our views only as of today and should not be relied 
      upon as representing our views as of any subsequent date. Actual results 
      may differ materially due to various other factors, including: economic 
      conditions, such as the levels of new home and other construction 
      activity, employment levels, the availability of mortgage, construction 
      and other financing, mortgage and other interest rates, housing 
      affordability and supply, the levels of foreclosures and home resales, 
      currency exchange rates and consumer confidence; our ability to maintain 
      or achieve price increases; our substantial indebtedness and our ability 
      to incur substantial additional indebtedness; capital markets conditions 
      and the availability of borrowings under our credit agreement or other 
      financings; competitive conditions, such as price, service and product 
      competition; certain of our customers having significant buying power; 
      the loss of one or more major customers and our customers’ ability to 
      meet their financial obligations to us; shortages in raw materials or 
      changes in raw material and energy costs; our ability to successfully 
      operate the joint venture with Boral Limited, including risks that our 
      joint venture partner, Boral Limited, may not fulfill its obligations as 
      an investor or may take actions that are inconsistent with our 
      objectives; volatility in the assumptions used to determine the funded 
      status of our pension plans; our ability to protect our intellectual 
      property and other proprietary rights; a security breach of company 
      information; changes in laws or regulations, including environmental and 
      safety regulations; the outcome in legal and governmental proceedings; 
      the occurrence of an “ownership change” within the meaning of the 
      Internal Revenue Code; the effects of acts of terrorism or war upon 
      domestic and international economies and financial markets; and acts of 
      God. We assume no obligation to update any forward-looking information 
      contained in this press release. Additional information concerning these 
      and other factors may be found in our filings with the Securities and 
      Exchange Commission, including the “Risk Factors” in our most recent 
      Annual Report on Form 10-K.





Contacts

      USG CorporationMediaKathleen Prause, 312-436-6607kprause@usg.comorInvestorsRyan 
      Flanagan, 312-436-5304investorrelations@usg.com















Contacts

      USG CorporationMediaKathleen Prause, 312-436-6607kprause@usg.comorInvestorsRyan 
      Flanagan, 312-436-5304investorrelations@usg.com









 
 

 






Search




Advanced News Search

Advanced News Search













Log In
Sign Up












Manufacturing and Industrial Stocks | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Manufacturing and Industrial StocksLydian International (LYDIF) Presents At Sprott Conference - SlideshowLYDIF• Today, 2:04 PM • SA TranscriptsDreamliner Performance SatisfiesBA• Today, 1:15 PM • Dhierin BechaiKlabin S.A. ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesKLBAY• Today, 11:31 AM • SA TranscriptsUS Ecology, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesECOL• Today, 11:12 AM • SA TranscriptsRockwell Collins, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCOL• Today, 9:48 AM • SA TranscriptsColfax Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCFX• Today, 9:48 AM • SA TranscriptsAV Homes, Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAVHI• Today, 8:51 AM • SA TranscriptsBarnes Group Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesB• Today, 8:50 AM • SA TranscriptsBombardier Inc.B 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBDRBF• Today, 7:39 AM • SA TranscriptsHitachi Ltd. ADR 2017 Q1 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesHTHIY• Today, 4:28 AM • SA TranscriptsMTU Aero Engines AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMTUAF• Today, 4:03 AM • SA TranscriptsGeneral Dynamics: Another Solid Quarter, Overvaluation PersistsGD• Today, 3:30 AM • Sure Dividend•5 CommentsCaterpillar: OK, What Now?CAT• Yesterday, 3:32 PM • Vince Martin•7 CommentsCaterpillar Breaks Out On Massive Full-Year Guidance UpgradeCAT• Yesterday, 2:54 PM • Michael FitzsimmonsWest Fraser Timber Co. (WFTBF) Acquires Gilman - M&A SlideshowWFTBF• Yesterday, 2:53 PM • SA TranscriptsEMCOR Group, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesEME• Yesterday, 2:49 PM • SA TranscriptsUndervalued And Growing: Argan, Inc.AGX• Yesterday, 1:52 PM • Ty Huggins•5 CommentsAdomani: Electric Buses Are The Way To GoADOM• Yesterday, 12:41 PM • Marcus Mincey•1 CommentMilacron Holdings 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMCRN• Yesterday, 12:18 PM • SA TranscriptsBoeing: Sagging Yield Is A Warning SignBA• Yesterday, 11:54 AM • Stone Fox Capital•28 CommentsTriMas Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTRS• Yesterday, 11:03 AM • SA TranscriptsL-3 Communications Holdings Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLLL• Yesterday, 10:07 AM • SA TranscriptsAGCO Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAGCO• Yesterday, 9:50 AM • SA TranscriptsCurtiss-Wright Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCW• Yesterday, 8:31 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing: StunningBA• Yesterday, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•34 CommentsStanley Black & Decker: 140 Consecutive Years Of Dividend Payments And Powerful BrandsSWK• Yesterday, 7:27 AM • Simply Safe Dividends•3 CommentsHoneywell: The Story Continues To Get BetterHON• Yesterday, 6:36 AM • WG Investment Research•4 CommentsTime To Get Off The Caterpillar TractorCAT• Yesterday, 5:17 AM • Reason Investments•7 CommentsDynacor Gold: Signs Of A Turnaround?DNGDF• Yesterday, 4:25 AM • Gold Mining Bull•4 Comments3M: Still A Great Company After Q2 Earnings ReleaseMMM• Yesterday, 4:05 AM • Ploutos Investing•4 CommentsPlug Power Surprisingly Increases Expensive Credit Facility With NY Green BankPLUG• Yesterday, 12:24 AM • Henrik Alex•29 CommentsTower International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTOWR• Yesterday, 12:03 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International Is Still A BargainMDR• Wed, Jul. 26, 5:28 PM • Orthodox Investor•7 CommentsIDEX Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIEX• Wed, Jul. 26, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsD. R. Horton Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesDHI• Wed, Jul. 26, 4:59 PM • SA TranscriptsThe Boeing Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesBA• Wed, Jul. 26, 2:51 PM • SA Transcripts•3 CommentsBoeing Is Hitting New All-Time HighsBA• Wed, Jul. 26, 12:45 PM • Jonathan Weber•11 CommentsBoeing: This Amazes MeBA• Wed, Jul. 26, 10:45 AM • Quad 7 Capital•25 CommentsUnited States Steel Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesX• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:20 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentUSG Corporation 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUSG• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsTimken Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesTKR• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:19 AM • SA TranscriptsRockwell Automation, Inc. 2017 Q3 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesROK• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:17 AM • SA TranscriptsIngersoll-Rand plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesIR• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsFLIR Systems, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesFLIR• Wed, Jul. 26, 9:14 AM • SA Transcripts3M: Buy The Dip For Growth And IncomeMMM• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:50 AM • Stefan Redlich•11 CommentsJoint French-German Fighter Jet Initiative May Affect Lockheed's F-35 Sales ProspectsLMT• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:49 AM • Zoltan Ban•47 CommentsGEA Group AG 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGEAGF• Wed, Jul. 26, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsGKN Plc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesGKNCF• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:31 AM • SA TranscriptsIran And Its Love For Western AircraftBA, EADSF• Wed, Jul. 26, 7:30 AM • Dhierin Bechai•5 CommentsI Was Wrong About CaterpillarCAT• Wed, Jul. 26, 6:58 AM • Josh Arnold•13 CommentsLonza Group AG ADR 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLZAGY• Wed, Jul. 26, 2:27 AM • SA TranscriptsHoneywell Is Off To The Races AgainHON• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:13 PM • Josh Arnold•1 CommentIllinois Tool Works Finding It Harder To Clear A Rising BarITW• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:47 PM • Stephen Simpson, CFA•2 CommentsWestport Fuel Systems: Consensus EBIT Estimates Miss The MarkWPRT• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:22 PM • Eric R. I. Crawford•43 CommentsCrane Co. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCR• Tue, Jul. 25, 1:04 PM • SA TranscriptsSnap-on: The Market Rightfully Discounts Current MarginsSNA• Tue, Jul. 25, 12:35 PM • The Value Investor•1 CommentAllegheny Technologies Incorporated 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesATI• Tue, Jul. 25, 11:40 AM • SA TranscriptsLincoln Electric Holdings, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesLECO• Tue, Jul. 25, 10:28 AM • SA TranscriptsMcDermott International, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMDR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:35 AM • SA TranscriptsPentair Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPNR• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:16 AM • SA TranscriptsPulteGroup, Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesPHM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA TranscriptsAltra Industrial Motion Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAIMC• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts3M Company 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesMMM• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:15 AM • SA Transcripts•13 CommentsCaterpillar Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesCAT• Tue, Jul. 25, 9:13 AM • SA Transcripts•1 CommentOutokumpu OYJ 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesOUTKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 8:02 AM • SA TranscriptsBoeing 787 Needs Aggressive Cost CuttingBA• Tue, Jul. 25, 7:00 AM • Dhierin Bechai•21 CommentsUPM-Kymmene Corp. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesUPMKF• Tue, Jul. 25, 6:24 AM • SA TranscriptsAkzo Nobel N.V. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesAKZOF• Tue, Jul. 25, 4:57 AM • SA TranscriptsStanley Black & Decker: Yet Another Classic Beat And Raise QuarterSWK• Tue, Jul. 25, 2:10 AM • Greg Wajda•3 CommentsALR's Stock Of The Week: Interface Inc.TILE• Mon, Jul. 24, 3:10 PM • Paul Price•4 CommentsAeroVironment: Post-Earnings Gains Get To (Or Past) Fair ValueAVAV• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:23 PM • Vince Martin•3 CommentsQuanta Services (PWR) Acquires Stronghold - M&A SlideshowPWR• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:23 PM • SA TranscriptsPlug Power (PLUG) expands relationship with Walmart - SlideshowPLUG• Mon, Jul. 24, 1:11 PM • SA Transcripts•3 CommentsIllinois Tool Works Inc. 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesITW• Mon, Jul. 24, 11:08 AM • SA TranscriptsArconic Inc 2017 Q2 - Results - Earnings Call SlidesARNC• Mon, Jul. 24, 9:02 AM • SA Transcripts123456...220Next Page





Earnings Call Transcripts | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO» 








Earnings Transcripts


  Sectors 


All
Most Popular

Basic Materials
Conglomerates
Consumer Goods
Financial
Healthcare
Industrial Goods
Services
Technology
Utilities










Bombardier's (BDRBF) CEO Alain Bellemare on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BDRBF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  2:02 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




AV Homes' (AVHI) CEO Roger Cregg on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AVHI•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  2:02 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Yamana Gold's (AUY) CEO Peter Marrone on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AUY•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:57 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Acadia Healthcare (ACHC) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ACHC•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:55 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Quaker Chemical's (KWR) CEO Michael Barry on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


KWR•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:37 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Aaron's (AAN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


AAN•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:37 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




CGG's (CGG) CEO Jean-Georges Malcor on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CGG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:33 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Welltower's (HCN) CEO Tom DeRosa on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HCN•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:31 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Weyerhaeuser (WY) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WY•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:29 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Weingarten Realty's (WRI) CEO Drew Alexander on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WRI•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Valero Energy Partners' (VLP) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


VLP•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Entercom Communications' (ETM) CEO David Field on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ETM•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Magellan Health Services' (MGLN) CEO Barry Smith on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MGLN•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:25 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Hill-Rom Holdings (HRC) Q3 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


HRC•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:19 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Dundee Precious Metals' (DPMLF) CEO Rick Howes on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


DPMLF•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:12 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Simpson Manufacturing's (SSD) CEO Karen Colonias on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SSD•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:10 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Leggett & Platt's (LEG) CEO Karl Glassman on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


LEG•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:09 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Southside Bancshares' (SBSI) CEO Lee Gibson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


SBSI•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:05 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Basic Energy Services' (BAS) CEO Roe Patterson on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BAS•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:04 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




CMS Energy (CMS) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CMS•
      Fri, Jul. 28,  1:03 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Proximus' (BGAOF) CEO Dominique Leroy on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


BGAOF•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:58 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




CIRCOR International's (CIR) CEO Scott Buckhout on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CIR•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:50 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Federated Investors' (FII) CEO Chris Donahue on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


FII•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:49 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




ATN International's (ATNI) CEO Michael Prior on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ATNI•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:48 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Merck & Co. (MRK) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


MRK•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:47 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




WisdomTree Investments' (WETF) CEO Jonathan Steinberg on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


WETF•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:43 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Exactech's (EXAC) CEO David Petty on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EXAC•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:36 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Erie Indemnity's (ERIE) CEO Tim NeCastro on Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


ERIE•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:29 PM

        •
SA Transcripts




Eros International's (EROS) CEO Jyoti Deshpande on Q4 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


EROS•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:28 PM

        •
SA Transcripts
•1 Comment 



Calpine (CPN) Q2 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript


CPN•
      Fri, Jul. 28, 12:23 PM

        •
SA Transcripts





123456...4453Next Page





Search Transcripts






You can use: AND,NOT, OR,* *(exact phrase)













 











 


USG (USG) Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call Transcript | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»USG (USG) Q1 2017 Results - Earnings Call TranscriptApr.27.17 | About: USG Corporation (USG) USG Corp. (NYSE:USG)
Q1 2017 Earnings Call
April 27, 2017 9:00 am ET
Executives
Ryan Flanagan - USG Corp.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Analysts
Kevin Hocevar - Northcoast Research Partners LLC
Scott Rednor - Zelman & Associates
Stephen Kim - Evercore ISI
Michael Jason Rehaut - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Marshall Mentz - RBC Capital Markets LLC
John Lovallo - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Michael Wood - Nomura Instinet
Garik S. Shmois - Longbow Research LLC
Michael Dahl - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Philip Ng - Jefferies LLC
Trey H. Grooms - Stephens, Inc.
Keith Hughes - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc.
Scott Schrier - Citigroup Global Markets, Inc.
Operator
Welcome to the Quarter One 2017 USG Corporation's Earnings Conference Call. My name is Katie and I will be your operator for today's call. At this time, all participants are in a listen-only mode. Later, we will conduct a question-and-answer session. Please note this conference is being recorded.
I'd now turn the call over to Ryan Flanagan. Ryan, please go ahead.
Ryan Flanagan - USG Corp.
Thank you. Good morning and welcome to USG Corporation's first-quarter 2017 earnings conference call and live webcast. We'll be using a slide presentation in conjunction with our call today. It's available by going to the Investor Relations section of our website, www.usg.com, and clicking on the link to the webcast.
Before we proceed, let me remind you that certain statements in this conference call may be forward-looking statements under securities laws. These statements are made on the basis of management's current views and assumption of our business, market and other conditions and management undertakes no obligation to update these statements.
These statements are also subject to a number of factors, including those listed at the end of the press release, and actual results may be different from our current expectations. In addition, please refer to our earnings press release and presentation slides for disclosures and reconciliations on non-GAAP measures used when discussing our results and outlook.
With me today to discuss the first quarter are Jenny Scanlon, President and Chief Executive Officer; and Matt Hilzinger, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Jenny will lead out the call with some opening commentary on the first quarter. Matt will then review the first-quarter financial results for the corporation and the business segments. Jenny will close with discussions surrounding an update on our strategic initiatives and then we'll open the call for questions.
As always, we ask our participants to limit themselves to one question to get as many people an opportunity to participate in the call as possible.
So, with that, I'll turn the call over to Jenny Scanlon.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Thanks, Ryan, and good morning. I'm pleased to talk to you today about our first-quarter results and I'm also eager to share the progress we've made on some of the strategic priorities we previously outlined. But, first, I want to make three overarching comments.
Number one, we have an operationally sound quarter with a 3% year-on-year revenue increase and we've realized a 5% wallboard price increase. We are operationally sound. However, a sharp uptick in key raw materials detracted from our margins, which we expect to abate as we move into the balance of the year. And then, additionally, we have to bear in mind that we are comping against a very strong first quarter last year.
Second, I continue to be really optimistic about the health of our industry this year. We are seeing solid organic growth for our products. Given our observed continued strength in household formation and wage growth, along with homebuilder confidence and commercial stability, I feel better about our end-markets than I did 90 days ago. And in fact, the healthy levels of true organic demand have led us to add people to serve our customers in the best possible manner.

And third, I believe in our reinvestment strategy. We are investing in lowering our costs and we're investing in seeding future growth and we're also returning capital to shareholders. You'll hear more today about our advanced manufacturing program as well as the launch of our next generation of Sheetrock Brand UltraLight wallboard, named EcoSmart. And you'll hear about the progress we've made on our share buyback program.
Because of these three overarching themes, operationally sound, industry optimism and reinvestment for future strength, I believe that our performance and our outlook outweigh the cost challenges that we face during this first quarter. And these are cost challenges that we're actively mitigating and we do expect to abate throughout the year.
And now, before I turn it over to Matt, I would like to reiterate a comment that I made on our last call. I said that the transition of the L&W business was exceeding my expectations and I'm repeating that message again this morning. You'll remember that we established a supply agreement to ensure an orderly transition for both parties and I continue to be pleased with how this supply agreement is framing the continued strong relationship that we have with L&W.
And equally important, we've been able to increase our business with other existing customers and also add a number of new customers. So, these are all important factors to consider as you review our quarter.
And now, I'm going to turn it over to Matt to cover the numbers in detail and then, I'll come back to wrap up with an update on our reinvestment strategies and innovation initiatives before we take your questions.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Thanks, Jenny, and good morning, everyone. That's really great context for the first quarter. It's a quarter that requires perspective in both in terms of the period that we're comparing our results to and perspective around balance of the year. And I'll touch on both of those in my comments today.
Overall, as Jenny said, we had a solid quarter that was unusually impacted by a strong uptick in commodity input cost and a pretty tough comp from a year ago. Other than the uptick in commodity costs, our outlook for the year really hasn't changed. We continue to see strength in all of our end-markets.
So, getting into the numbers, let's briefly start with consolidated results. For the first quarter, net sales were up 3% to $767 million. We generated $55 million in adjusted net income and $0.37 of adjusted diluted earnings per share and that compares to $56 million and $0.38 a year ago.
So, let me get into the segments now. Starting with Gypsum, net sales for the first quarter were up 3% from last year to $649 million. Adjusted operating margin was down 290 basis points to 14%, relative to our very strong first quarter performance a year ago. Our margin decline was primarily due to an unusual spike in commodity cost and lower volumes relative to last year.
So, recall that the first quarter of 2016, we saw wallboard volumes across the industry increase by 26% on pre-buy dynamics, which also drove favorability in unit costs. So, our U.S. wallboard volumes were down just under 4% from the first quarter a year ago on this tough comp and this is pretty much in line with the rest of the industry, which was down as a whole.
As Jenny said, it's also very important to note that our year-over-year volumes were not negatively impacted by our transition with L&W, as we've been able to replace those volumes at L&W with volumes at new and current customers.
So, moving to wallboard price, our U.S. wallboard price was up 5% year-on-year in the first quarter. Our price increase went into effect late January compared to last year's price that went into the end of March. Just be aware that this creates a softer comp this quarter and a little bit more challenging comp next quarter.

Regarding Canada, the final wallboard dumping rule for transfer pricing became effective during the first quarter. The key takeaway is that we are required to charge higher prices for wallboard in Western Canada going forward and we saw some benefit from this in the first quarter.
Now, moving to costs. Costs for the first quarter were up significantly on a year-over-year basis, driving $16 million of unfavorability in our profit bridge. Before I break that first quarter number down for you, let me just give you some full-year perspective on our Gypsum costs. While our costs for the first quarter were up $16 million over an unusually low-cost quarter a year ago, I expect that our full-year 2017 Gypsum cost increased to be closer to just half of that or 3% or 4% for the remainder of the year.
So, while commodity costs are always subject to variation, I expect that first quarter to be the high watermark for Gypsum costs.
So, regarding the first quarter, waste paper pricing in the OCC market was the single biggest source of increased cost that we saw. Waste paper by itself drove a third of our total cost increase. Our OCC costs were up over 50% compared to the prior year and most of that came in the months of February and March.
Keep in mind that OCC pricing tends to peak seasonally in the first quarter and I believe that the waste paper markets will ease from these levels throughout the year, due in part to higher OCC production in the spring as well as softer demand from China heading into the summer.
We also saw cost increase in our synthetic gypsum, which amounted to another third of our total costs in the first quarter. Where there continues to be more than enough synthetic gypsum in the U.S. to meet our production needs, the transportation costs associated with synthetic gypsum have increased as we source from different utilities.
We do expect our synthetic gypsum costs to abate over the course of the year based on seasonal production levels at the power plants that serve us. There were few other factors that drove up cost a bit too, including product mix, lower volumes as I had mentioned and some planned incremental costs for advanced manufacturing.
Gas, as expected, was flat with last year and we expect gas to remain flat to last year's cost through the balance of the year.
Moving to surfaces and substrates, product revenue grew 4%, while profitability decreased 1%. Volume was up roughly 4% in our surfaces and substrates products, which contributed roughly $3 million in profit. This was offset by higher costs of $4 million due to increases in primarily three input costs, cement costs; paper costs; and some labor.
For the rest of 2017, I expect positive profit contribution each quarter on a year-on-year basis in this area. And, folks, this is a great area for us. It has delivered profitable growth over the past few years and it's a focus area that I expect will continue to deliver real growth and profits into the future.
Moving to Ceilings, we saw 390 basis point of margin contraction when compared to an all-time record first quarter a year ago. The headline for you is that our volume run rate in the first quarter was lower than what we expect to see for the balance of the year and costs were higher than what we're projecting for the balance of the year. So, U.S. Ceiling volumes decreased mid-single digits across tile and grid products from a year ago, due primarily to some inventory rebalancing at a key customer.
Based on our forecast, commercial construction trends and lots of conversations with key customers, we continue to expect that our full-year Ceilings volumes to be up in the low-single digits, consistent with our original guidance.
In terms of manufacturing costs, we saw year-on-year cost increase in both tile and grid, although steel was the most pronounced. We did see a bit of cost increase in tiles, but that was driven primarily by maintenance around advanced manufacturing investments.

Just remember, last year, steel price dropped dramatically and we recognized a benefit when it did. Steel prices have now moved back to a more normalized level and that's what we're seeing in the first quarter; more normalized steel costs against a strong prior-year tailwind. So, looking to the balance of the year, steel costs will continue to be a headwind to the tune of maybe $2 million to $3 million per quarter.
Lastly, our Ceilings pricing was flat in the first quarter due to customer mix as well as some tweaks that we made to customer incentive programs to drive growth in 2017.
Moving to USG Boral, this segment had very strong first quarter. This is a quarter that is typically the slowest in the year on a seasonal basis. So, really good performance out of Boral. The total JV earned $37 million in adjusted operating profit and adjusted operating margins were up 290 basis points to 13.4% on strong performance from our plasterboard business.
Plasterboard volumes across the entire JV were up 16%, led by strong double-digit growth in Korea and mid-single-digit growth in Australia. Plasterboard price saw the greatest improvement in these markets as well and market conversion from our standard plasterboard to our Sheetrock next-gen board increased sequentially by 400 basis points to 36%. And our adjacent products continued to grow as well with steel studs up 20% and mineral-fiber ceilings up 60%.
So, I'll finish with some brief comments on SG&A, our share repurchase program and our debt refinancing plans. Starting with SG&A, consolidated SG&A spending was up $5 million year-on-year in the first quarter and that was simply timing of expenses. Our original full-year SG&A target of around $300 million for 2017 has not changed.
Regarding our share repurchase program, which started in February, we repurchased about 750,000 shares for roughly $25 million during the first quarter. Jenny and I, as well as the board, remain very committed to this program and I'll keep you up-to-date as we progress through the year. As a reminder, the total program is authorized for repurchases up to $250 million, targeted over the next 12 to 18 months.
With respect to our debt plans, I expect to refinance the 2018 $500 million bonds as well as our credit facility in the very near term and I'll keep you posted on that as well.
So, with that, let me turn it back to Jenny, who can update you on our strategy.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Thank you, Matt. On our last call, I outlined our 2017 strategy, which begins with maintaining a strong balance sheet, continues with lowering our breakeven and balances investments for future growth. We're also committed to returning excess cash to shareholders. And so, today, I want to talk about two elements of our strategy, which address pressing challenges faced by our industry.
The first element is our previously-announced advanced manufacturing program, that structurally improves our manufacturing cost with an eye toward our industry's anticipated skilled labor shortages in the future.
And the second element is an example of investments we're making to strengthen our core wallboard business through innovation. We are really excited about the launch of our next-generation of wallboard, Sheetrock Brand EcoSmart Panels, which aid in addressing sustainability challenges of water usage and CO2 emissions; challenges also faced by our industry.
So, on to the first element, our advanced manufacturing program, which you can see on slide 12, accelerated this past quarter. You'll remember that advanced manufacturing initiatives are a strategic investment in our manufacturing operations and this investment aligns with our commitment to lower costs while providing safer environments and a more efficient workplace.

We are focused on adopting advanced technology and automation, which can be replicated across our plants to eliminate low-value work and allow our employees to focus on making better products in a safer environment.
So, simply put, what is it? We're using automation, Lean Six Sigma, training and performance metrics to streamline labor-intensive manufacturing processes and we're also establishing a data-rich environment that will deploy advanced analytics to facilitate continuous improvement for many years to come. Advanced manufacturing represents a permanent step change in our cost structure that further lowers our breakeven.
By planning to invest up to $300 million in advanced manufacturing, we expect to achieve an annual run rate savings of $100 million of EBITDA, which we expect will drop to the bottom line. Roughly 85% of this investment and return is expected in the Gypsum business with 15% in the Ceilings business. And, again, we're using Lean Six Sigma methodology to assess the feasibility of projects that can be replicated across our plants.
Performance metrics will enable us to track progress toward the financial goals for reporting advanced manufacturing's contribution to operating margins, EBITDA and EBIT.
And so, lastly, on slide 12, you'll see our forecast for the trajectory of both investment spending and the return on these investments. You'll note that investment spending is relatively evenly spread out over the next three years and we can accelerate or decelerate those as we see fit based on the types of results and as well as market conditions.
In evaluating the timing of expected returns, please understand we're executing these initiatives on a repeatable basis. So, we're piloting each project at one location, establishing a blueprint and rolling out each best-in-class solution to the rest of our plant network where it makes sense to do so. So, this approach mitigates execution risk while maximizing benefits.
And you can see on slide 12 that assuming we spend $70 million, which is planned for 2017, we would expect to increase EBITDA by about $25 million from this year to next year.
So, on slide 13, you'll see some examples of individual projects that we have under the advanced manufacturing umbrella. And now, for competitive reasons, we're not going to list everything we're doing. We've identified over 200 projects. However, these examples on these pictures should give you a tangible feel for the types of projects we're undertaking.
So, these examples include when installing continuous mining equipment to mine gypsum around the clock safely. We're mapping our quarries and auditing our stockpiles using an iPad, an employee and a drone instead of assigning a team of people to make manual calculations.
We're deploying self-guided forklifts that work safely and efficiently 24/7, loading our warehouses and staging loads for our customers. And we're implementing equipment that can handle, cut and stack wallboard efficiently, autonomously and safely.
So, again, when we talk about advanced manufacturing, we're not talking about revenue synergies or abstract cross-selling opportunities to get to that $100 million in benefits, this is about eliminating low-value work and allowing our employees to focus on making better products at a lower cost in safer environment. And these projects are all under our roof and in our warehouse. So, we expect to update this information for you throughout the course of the program and Matt and I are using this as a scorecard with our teams to assess progress and performance.
We're very excited about how we believe advanced manufacturing will position USG for years to come.
Now, the second element of our strategy I'd like to discuss is strengthening our core wallboard business through innovation. We were really excited in March to unveil our latest innovative product, EcoSmart Panels, the next generation of 5/8" and Sheetrock Brand wallboard. It's lighter, it's greener and is better performing than standard wallboard.

EcoSmart Panels are the industry's first wallboard panels that are both lightweight and sustainable. These are features and benefits that are increasingly important for commercial construction. The manufacturing process used to produce EcoSmart Panels reduces water usage by 25% and reduces carbon dioxide emissions by 20%. EcoSmart Panels are 20% lighter than our standard 5/8" board and offer proven 10% productivity improvement for our customers.
And perhaps what's most exciting is that EcoSmart Panels are beginning to be specified by architects, which is the first for wallboard. It's the first wallboard product to be specified based on how it's made because of the meaningful difference in the environmental impact of the product.
So, having an innovative wallboard product in our portfolio that is unique in how it addresses sustainability challenges also enables us to pull through other products to both new and existing customers. This is a significant leap forward in wallboard technology that we believe is a game changer in the market and a real competitive advantage in North America and around the world.
As we move through the rest of the year, I expect to continue to update you on the elements of our strategy, including plans to fuel incremental growth by commercializing other non-wallboard platforms and products more rapidly.
So, before we open it up for questions, let me close by emphasizing we have a clear strategy and a bright outlook. We are serving all of our customers very well. We expect costs to increase in 2017, but we have cost mitigation plans in place for some of this increase and we are expecting some abatement in raw material price increases throughout the year.
We're deploying strategic capital to drive profitable growth with new and innovative products and we're structurally reducing costs. We're also returning capital to shareholders. I believe we're in great shape and we will continue to evolve in our ability to drive shareholder value.
So, with that, operator, at this time, let's open the call for questions and remember, as Ryan said, let's keep it to one per person. Thanks.
Question-and-Answer Session
Operator
Thank you. We will now begin the question-and-answer session. And our first question comes from Kevin Hocevar from Northcoast Research. Please go ahead.
Kevin Hocevar - Northcoast Research Partners LLC
Hey, good morning, everybody. Matt, you gave some good detail on the raw material inflation that you're seeing in kind of your outlook. I was wondering if you can give a little bit more detail in terms of some the key assumptions. I think, you said that paper price was up over 50% in the first quarter, synthetic gypsum was up a bunch. What are you seeing out of paper now? What type of inflation are you seeing in the second quarter? Have you seen any abatement yet? And what's kind of baked into that 3% to 4%? What type of abatement do you expect out of synthetic and paper as we go through the year?
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Good morning, Kevin. I'm going to let Matt go into the details on that, but I do want to emphasize one thing that hasn't change in our emphasis, which is on margin expansion in every business. And we're making investments across the board, advanced manufacturing, ongoing pricing decisions, commitment to Lean Six Sigma, but as you're getting into and as Matt will give us the details, there are going to be some quarters like this one where the timing of the commodity cost uptick and our investments for future growth detract from our ability to expand margin, but we are in this for the long term and Matt's going to go into the details of what we expect for the rest of the year.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Hey, Kevin. So, one thing is just put it in perspective, USG has a great history of mitigating cost and being able to reduce cost. And so, I'll speak a little bit about this quarter and a little bit about the balance of the year and give you a little bit of insight into what we see as kind of base level inflation in the business other than these commodity costs, but with respect to OCC, it was up around 57% for the first quarter and specific to your question, we have seen a little bit of relief in April and we expect more relief really to come into May.

For the balance of the year, OCC is probably going to be 20% to 30% above what it was last year. So, if you think about kind of numbers and how they roll through the P&L on paper cost, which is about 20% of our input for our wallboard, just to give everybody a level set, but as we think about cost that roll through, it was probably $6 million out of the $16 million was paper cost. And so, we would think that that's going to abate to probably half as we go through the balance of the year.
So, think of a headwind in OCC of maybe $2 million to $3 million each quarter for the second through the fourth quarter. And again, it's a commodity, it might move up and down, but we do see it and expect it to abate. We see production moving up in the spring. As I said, the first quarter is typically the high watermark and demand in China is tailing off. And so, you can't be absolutely certain, but we're pretty confident at this point on everything that we're saying, that that's a reasonable way to think about OCC.
On synthetic gypsum, very similar story. I think, this is the high watermark. If you think about the $16 million, probably $6 million was synthetic gypsum and most of that was transportation cost. And it's partly because or mostly due to the power plants that we source from that are closest to our wallboard plants didn't run as much as they did in the prior year.
And so, there's plenty of supply out there. It's just a matter of getting it to the plant. So, this isn't a supply issue. This is really a transportation cost issue. And again, I would expect to mitigate about half of that as we go through the balance of the year, that if you think about $6 million in the first quarter, probably a headwind of $3 million per quarter going forward.
Again, it's not a true commodity, but it acts like a commodity. And so, things that can influence synthetic gypsum costs are things like weather, natural gas prices. I think it would be awesome if we had double-digit demand in wallboard and that would probably drive synthetic gypsum costs up, but we have great demand story.
So, there's some things that can move it around, but basically the way we're seeing it right now is those commodity costs will be pretty much mitigated as we go through the balance of the year. And then, the other thing I would just say on the Gypsum business is there is some remaining other costs that I talked about and there were like $4 million or $5 million of other costs. Part of that is mix; product mix. So, we sold a little bit more 5/8". Part of it was advanced manufacturing and about $2 million was labor.
So, from my perspective, when I sit there and think about the inherent underlying inflation in the Gypsum business, I mean, like $2 million of increased labor and then we had some spikes in commodity costs. So, it's not like the costs in the business are rampant and out of control, we're managing them very tightly and we got hit with some spikes in commodity costs. So, I feel pretty good about where we are and where we're headed into the year.
And then, one last comment, because I don't want to hog everybody's time on the – for questions, but just on Ceilings cost, right, if you go back, Ceilings cost is primarily steel. We had a little bit of an uptick in the tile cost that was due primarily to some work around advanced manufacturing. And last year, we had a nice tailwind on steel cost. We called it out every quarter. And steel cost had moved a little bit back above what they were at the beginning of the year a year ago, but to a more normalized level, and that's effectively what's happening. So, the headwind is really kind of reversal of the tailwind and the benefit that we got last year.
So, again, when you think about costs and our production cost and how we operate, it's really very, very low inherent underlying inflation in the business. We just got hit with some commodity costs. So, hope that answers your question. And we'll move on to the next person.

Operator
Our next question comes from Scott Rednor from Zelman & Associates. Please go ahead.
Scott Rednor - Zelman & Associates
Yeah. Hi. Good morning. Matt, I was hoping you could explain the noise with Canada. Obviously, last quarter, there was a big tailwind. This quarter, even with the higher prices, profit was down. It doesn't look like there was some noise on your U.S. operations. So, could you maybe just kind of clarify how we should think about that with the final tariffs in place?
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Yeah. I think, Scott, the way I would think about it is, I think last quarter, we tried to parse out some stuff, because it was still very much influx with the Canadian authorities. And it was kind of unclear as to what was going to happen. And so, obviously, they ruled – the Canadian authorities ruled in the first quarter.
And effectively, I will tell you, if you go take a look at the documents, they are incredibly complicated. So, again, my headline is, is that we are required to charge higher prices in Western Canada for imports. We've done that. I think, our strategy is quite frankly to try and increase some production in Eastern Canada and have it flow over into Western Canada.
Obviously, we want to serve our customers in the best way we can. And then, there will be and continue to be some exports into Western Canada. I don't want to try and parse into how much – what the benefit was in Canada, because I'd tell you what, it just – it starts to get really muddy and the numbers start to just look a little goofy when you start going through it.
So, just suffice it to say that this is something that we think is relatively permanent, meaning that they ruled for at least five years. So, the idea that wallboard pricing in Canada is going to – it's still market pricing, but you have to charge a higher price, but to think that that's going to reverse or go back in a different direction over the next five years is very unlikely. And so, we really do kind of view this as a permanent step change in how we're going to manufacture and deliver products to our customers in Canada.
Scott, since I have you on the phone and I hate to dominate this, but I think I read a write-up today and there was a question around our tax rate. I just want to clear that up. We're still guiding on 31% to 34%, our original guidance on taxes. There was an accounting rule change that required some mark-to-market on incentive comp that normally blew through equity needs to blow through the effective tax line. And so, we had expected that. So, the higher tax rate in the first quarter was not a surprise to us at all.
And again, the original guidance that we gave of 31% to 34% sticks and quite frankly, that's a mark-to-market, it could go up, it could go down. And so, you'll see a little bit more volatility in the ETR line, but no sweat, don't think that that's a big headwind for us. It's not.
With that, I'll turn it back to the operator.
Operator
Our next question comes from Stephen Kim from Evercore ISI. Please go ahead.
Stephen Kim - Evercore ISI
Yeah. Thanks very much, guys. Appreciate all the color on input cost inflation. I would just observe that your guidance would seem to suggest that you are – I think it may be a little ambiguous in your slide that your guidance is, I assume, on the drywall alone, not the Gypsum segment, when you talk about 3% to 4%, correct me if I'm wrong and that the $4 million in cost that you talk about in services and substrate is included in the $16 million that you're talking about for cost. Just want to make sure that's clear, because otherwise, I'm having trouble reconciling the numbers.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
No...
Stephen Kim - Evercore ISI
My...
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.

Go ahead, Stephen, I'm sorry to interrupt.
Stephen Kim - Evercore ISI
No, no, no. Just correct me if there's anything wrong in that. And then, I just wanted to ask if you were still seeing the dynamic that you had addressed back in March about how OCC pricing is only about 7% I believe you said of your costs and that it was less significant for you, given your geographic location – your geographic concentration away from the coasts.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Yeah. Let me address that one. I think that's correct and I think that's relative to other people out there too. And obviously, we don't know what other folks are doing on syn gyp. We think some have probably stockpiled, some are probably going to have to bear some costs, some are on more natural rock sources. So, can't really necessarily speak to what our competitors are going to deal with in terms of costs, but I've given you, I think, pretty clear guidance in terms of what we think we're doing on syn gyp.
And look, on the cost guidance piece, that $16 million is U.S. wallboard, right? So, surfaces and substrates is different. So, you'll see in the walk, there is a $1 million hit, right? That's $3 million of profit and $4 million of cost. So, if you added all of it together, it'd be $20 million, right? $16 million on U.S. wallboard and $4 million on surfaces and substrates. So, I think that's how I would think about it. When I talked about abating, it was really the U.S. wallboard side.
On surfaces and substrates, look, our view, right now, is that business is going to be profitable each quarter going forward. It's probably going to have a little bit of cost inflation, just because paper does go into some of that product. We've got some cement that goes into some of that product as well and we've seen a little price increase on that as well, but we would expect surfaces and substrates to turn net positive like it has for the last three years.
So, I hope that's helpful, Stephen.
Operator
And our next question comes from Michael Rehaut from JPMorgan. Please go ahead.
Michael Jason Rehaut - JPMorgan Securities LLC
Thanks very much. Good morning. My question has to do, I guess, going back with Gypsum margins and apologies if I'm asking a question might be a little duplicative with some of the comments you made earlier. It's been a crazy morning. I had to jump off briefly, but just trying to get a sense, when you think about the U.S. gypsum margin and the year-over-year decline and, obviously, you've kind of gone into great detail around the costs, but as you look out for the rest of the year, would you expect the margin decline to continue for at least the next couple of quarters, everything else equal, and when I say everything else, I'm specifically thinking about gypsum pricing or would there be an ability – would you be considering any type of additional price adjustments?
And I know you don't talk about price on a go-forward basis, but just conceptually, if you are experiencing higher inflation than expected, I presume that price would be one of the tools that would be used to offset that. So, kind of a two-part question. One, everything else equal, no changes to price or anything else, would you expect the margin decline to continue this year? And, two, is there an ability to make adjustments to the price in the marketplace if needed?
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah, Mike, thanks for the question. And I think, I want to reiterate that our emphasis on margin expansion in every business, our expectations around that for our team hasn't changed. We do believe, as Matt has indicated, that some of these commodity upticks are going to be abated, but we also know that we've given some guidance on expectations around costs.
Our pricing decisions have not changed with regard to – we don't comment on forward pricing, but I do want to remind everybody what the not-to-exceed pricing model means and what that means is we give our customers their pricing for a duration of time. We announce 30 days in advance any changes and that's in any not-to-exceed model, there are opportunities to have continued conversations with customers about what we're seeing in the marketplace.

Operator
Our next question comes from Bob Wetenhall from RBC Capital Markets. Please go ahead.
Marshall Mentz - RBC Capital Markets LLC
Good morning, this is actually Marshall Mentz on for Bob. In Ceilings, could you talk a bit more about the inventory rebalancing? It sounds transitory and you're maintaining your volume guidance, but could you give any more details there and do the rebate programs that you call out factor into that? And how should we think about the price environment, given those comments?
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah. Thanks. What we're seeing and what we're hearing in the marketplace in conversations with many of our customers is that there is a sense that the amount of inventory in the channel may have declined a bit, but that a number of our customers in many regions have reported a continued single-digit – low-single-digit volume increases out their doors. And so, we're really looking at some of the change in Ceiling volumes truly from a perspective of that context.
We do think with regard to both the rebate programs that we enacted, which are reflective of our growth expectations for the year, but our accrual for those growth expectations may have revealed some of that flatness in this quarter on price. And so, we feel good about the direction of the Ceilings business that we've been giving. It's a good low-single-digit volume increase.
We expect to see product mix continue to reflect the trends of higher-end premium products and we don't feel that anything else has changed in the Ceilings business. Our distribution channel hasn't changed, our contractor loyalty hasn't changed and demand for infill for repair and remodel hasn't changed. So, we feel like it's a pretty stable commercial environment for us.
Operator
Our next question comes from John Lovallo from Bank of America. Please go ahead.
John Lovallo - Bank of America Merrill Lynch
Hey, guys. Thank you for taking my call as well. My question is on the 5% pricing that you guys saw. I guess, if you can help parse it out maybe to what component of that was kind of true like-for-like pricing, what was maybe attributable to product mix, like EcoSmart, and then maybe if Canada played any part of that? Thanks.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah. I'm happy to report that we've seen a price increase across every channel, which resulted in 5% year-on-year and we also saw a volume movement in line with the industry, which I think is reflective of, what we believe is, this underlying organic growth and the success of the L&W transition. I will say that even without L&W, our top 5 customers, without L&W, increased volumes. And so, when you look at this price increase, again, we saw it across every channel.
We haven't changed anything in our formulas around our price and volume equation. We balance that. We've got some regions where we've seen some real strength. We've got some regions where there's some real favorable trends and we think all of this is reflective of our value proposition. EcoSmart, which is priced as a premium product, was launched really in mid-March. So, it didn't have any meaningful impact on the price increase that we saw in the channel this quarter.
Operator
Thank you. Our next question comes from Michael Wood from Nomura Instinet. Please go ahead.
Michael Wood - Nomura Instinet
Hi. Good morning. In light of the stepped-up input costs that you talked about, are you planning more productivity initiatives? And could you just comment on – I think you said $70 million advanced manufacturing spend. I believe it was $80 million that you called out last quarter in CapEx related to that. So, just some color there would be appreciated.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Hey, Mike. It's Matt. So, it fluctuates – I would say, $75 million to $80 million for advanced manufacturing and, look, part of that ebbs and flows, right? I mean, we haven't told the engineering team to go spend $74.2 million. I mean, it's a guidance, right? It's in that area. And to the extent that they can find projects and accelerate those and move them in, we'll do that, right. I mean, we're going to try and move this thing along as quickly as we can. So, part of that is just think about that as a guidance range. It's not – nothing has changed and it's – really, we're going to try and get as much as we possibly can.

And, look, in terms of productivity, I just – I want to be clear. I mean, this is not panic mode for us, right? I mean, input costs moved up a little bit. We think they're going to abate. As I said, the base inflation in the business, we think, is relatively small. We've had programs in place here at the company around Lean Six Sigma and productivity that continue on and they will continue on. And so, we aren't going to do anything here silly or stupid and cut a bunch of costs that are going to hurt our ability to grow or take away from our ability to get in advanced manufacturing.
And so, we've got a great history of being able to mitigate costs and that's what we're doing. And I think if you really look at the base inflation of the business, we've really been good at doing that. And so, it's really these commodity costs that have moved up and we'll abate them as best we can, but that's partly why we're putting in advanced manufacturing, right, is to get $100 million benefit at the cost line.
So, I think we're doing all the things that we need to do. And, look, we're always going to – look, trust me, Jenny and I have had lots of conversations with our supply and our operating group about what we can do to mitigate costs and they're working on it. And I can say this to our shareholders, we're going to give every ounce of effort we can to keep the cost low. And I think we've done that and I think we'll continue to do that.
Michael Wood - Nomura Instinet
Thank you.
Operator
Our next question comes from Jerry Revich from Goldman Sachs. Please go ahead.
Unknown Speaker
Hi. This is Abdul (45:08) on behalf of Jerry. I just had a question about Ceilings. So, price versus cost was negative in the quarter. Can you just talk a bit about why the price increases that were announced didn't stick? Thank you.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah, I think when you look across our channel in Ceilings, there're some noise this quarter that – around customer mix and some of the pricing flatness. And what we believe is a lowering of inventory across the channel. And so, it's really important to note that Ceilings is a 12 to 18-month sales cycle. And as we're out there, fitting jobs and quoting projects with our customers, the pricing evolves over time.
And so, indeed, we did see some flatness this quarter on pricing, but some of that is also reflective of the expanded rebates programs that we put out there for some key customers in our channels and the way in which that we're accruing for the expectations of the projects that they're going to win this year.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
And let me just add a little bit of color and detail to what Jenny said. On the customer mix piece, just think that the GSD (46:26), which typically sells the higher-value, higher-margin product, went down because of inventory balancing. And we sold a little bit more in the big box, which tends towards the more commodity oriented. So, that product mix can change pretty dramatically what you see on the price line. So, that's how I would think about the customer mix piece.
Operator
Our next question comes from Garik Shmois from Longbow Securities. Please go ahead.
Garik S. Shmois - Longbow Research LLC
Hi, thanks. Just had a follow-up on Ceilings demand. I just wonder if you could helps us maybe bridge the down mid-single-digit volume in the quarter to the low-single-digit volume outlook for the full year in the context of the inventory destocking that you saw on Q1. Should we expect to snap back at some point whether 2Q, 3Q on inventories or is your expectation that the volume growth from this point forward will be a more gradual climb towards your full-year guidance?
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Hey, Garik. It's Matt. I would put it in terms of – look, I don't know how long the balancing effort takes, right? Rebalancing inventory typically takes more than one quarter, right? So, we just – again, these are – our customers, they're doing what they need to do for their business. Hard to know exactly what they're going to do in terms of the timing of their rebalancing, but given what we did and given the low or the mid-single-digit decline that we saw in the first quarter, you'd have to have probably 3% to 4% growth in second, third and fourth quarter in order to kind of stay in that low-single digit for a total year's growth of kind of low-single digit.

So, will there be a snap back? Look, I think, Jenny said it earlier on, we're hearing that it's reasonably good demand at the end-market level. We just aren't seeing it because of our customers, certain customers rebalancing their inventory. So, we feel pretty good about where that is. Now, when that snaps back, I don't know; largely depends upon how our customers continue in, in their rebalancing program. So – but we feel – I think the main headline here is that we're still seeing kind of that low-single-digit growth in Ceilings out in the marketplace with our end-customers.
Operator
Our next question comes from Mike Dahl from Barclays. Please go ahead.
Michael Dahl - Barclays Capital, Inc.
Hi. Thanks for taking my question. Just a follow-up on the rebate comments. Just hoping just to clarify. Is this something that was kind of a proactive outreach to your customers, just given the ongoing L&W transition, or is it also somewhat reflective of just the ongoing consolidation among your larger distributors?
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah. I think the thing to bear in mind, Mike, is that our distribution channel, nothing about Ceilings' distribution changed with the transition of L&W from being part of USG to being independent. We haven't changed anything within that channel.
And so, really, the rebates are in anticipation of the market that's out there and the need for our distributors to continue to be as strong as they can be, supporting those contractors, who are loyal to USG products and getting out there and winning jobs in this 12 to 18-month cycle.
So, I wouldn't characterize it as anything other than a typical type of price volume equation that we do every year in all of our product lines.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Yeah. And I would add onto this, Mike. I'd add just a little bit of color to what Jenny said and that is, we have asked some of our customers to be a little bit more aggressive on the sales line in terms of sales growth, right? Not necessarily market share. We want to grow the market and we've given them some incentives to go do that. And so, it is a little different than the prior year from the standpoint that we're trying to incent growth with our customers.
Operator
Our next question comes from Phil Ng from Jefferies. Please go ahead.
Philip Ng - Jefferies LLC
Hey, guys. I cover some of the paper names, but I don't think any of these companies are expecting the magnitude of decline you called out for OCC. Just curious to what gives you that type of confidence. I know that it's a very regional business. And can you flesh out some of the pace of the cost savings that you're expecting to kick in over the course of the year? Is it a little more front-end loaded, back-end loaded? I think you guys got the SG&A largely unchanged. Thanks.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Yeah. Hi, Phil, it's Matt. Look, if you think about base inflation, as I talked about, like in labor in the U.S. gypsum business, it was like $2 million, right? I mean, I think we're going to kind of continue to see that and we're going to eat away at that a little bit. The commodity costs are the ones that I described, right? And they're going to move as they move and we think they're going to abate through the balance of the year. So, I think, I gave some good guidance in terms of how to think about those commodity costs through the balance of the year. Like every year we've had and every quarter we've had before this, we're going to continue to go through and work on productivity.
So, it's really – I mean, if you boil it down, it's primarily commodity costs that drove the first quarter variance against a last year that was incredibly beneficial on the cost line. And so, I don't think there's – there's not like a hockey stick or there's not – I mean, it's just, you got to think about how those commodity costs are going to roll through by quarter in order to kind of do your model. But it's not like we've got this huge benefit coming in, in the fourth quarter. I mean, it largely depends upon how commodity costs go through and we've given you a view on that. So...

Operator
Our next question comes from Trey Grooms from Stephens. Please go ahead.
Trey H. Grooms - Stephens, Inc.
Hey, good morning. Thanks for taking my question. I guess everything has pretty well been vetted that I had, but just one kind of housekeeping, I guess. Matt, can you remind us how much of your footprint on the Sheetrock side utilizes synthetic gypsum? And then, also you noted freight as a kind of a headwind there on the syn gyp side, I guess, getting the material from the utilities to the plant. How much of the increase that you've seen on synthetic gypsum is more of the freight versus more seasonal production cycles within the utility and how do we think about that? And I would think that you would have some long-term agreements with some of these utilities on pricing. Just if you can help us understand the mechanics and how that's moving around as well as the exposure there.
Matthew F. Hilzinger - USG Corp.
Yeah. Sure, Trey. So, look, about 40% of our rock source is synthetic gypsum and it's primarily a more East Coast than it is West Coast. And it's predominantly freight is the penalty. We do have longer-term contracts, but – so, most of it's freight. And part of the reason that we think it will abate a little bit, I talked a little bit about we're moving into the summer season when coal will – you just need more coal to go, but you can rail more in the summer months than you can in the winter months. And so, there are some things around the freight cost that we think will cause us to have lower freight cost as well, but it's predominantly freight. It's not the base cost of synthetic gypsum. So, I hope that's helpful.
Operator
Our next question comes from Keith Hughes from SunTrust. Please go ahead.
Keith Hughes - SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc.
Thank you. Just switching back to Gypsum for a minute, as you go through the rest of the year, I know that L&W is involved in the transition and you talked about how well it's gone, do you have a feel from them yet in terms of how quickly the transition go, will it go in the offseason? Any sort of clarity you can give on that will be helpful.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah. Thanks, Keith. The L&W transition is something that we planned with the supply agreement wrapped around it to be orderly and something that really was not going to change overall market dynamics and we feel good about that. I think we do have to go back and realize a comment I made in, I believe, the last call that channel conflict was real and having L&W as a independent specialty dealer is beneficial for us as a manufacturer, because it allows us to position our value proposition that really appeals to contractors. It allows us to position that and have contractors pull that through all players in the channel without feeling that there's conflict.
And so, as I said earlier, what we're seeing is that without L&W, our top five customers increased volume. We saw that last quarter. We see it this quarter. And our overall growth, we feel, is year-on-year, shipments are in line with industry. So, I think overall, this transition, like I said, is exceeding my expectations and it's orderly and it's going at the exact pace that we expected it to go.
Ryan Flanagan - USG Corp.
We have time for one other question.
Operator
Our next question comes from Scott Schrier from Citi. Please go ahead.
Scott Schrier - Citigroup Global Markets, Inc.
Hi. Thanks for squeezing me in there. I wanted to ask you about your new product on the EcoSmart, which – I think it's great that you're helping the environment. I just want to parse out maybe, how do you think about it from a penetration, from production cost and a margin perspective? Since it's light, I would expect a lower shipping cost, maybe whether you have some tailwinds on your R&D expenses and are there any other kind of marketing expenses near term with the rollout?

And then, lastly, if you could talk about, is this technology something you can move into other products such as your sheathing? Thank you.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
Yeah. Thanks, Scott. I love talking about EcoSmart. So, I'm glad you got your question in. We've addressed this first launch on the commercial industry and it really is out there to give architects the solution to help them meet commitments that they have made. There's this Architecture 2030 Challenge out there, which is all about coming up with buildings that have zero carbon footprint and they take that all the way back into the manufacturing process.
And so, what we're seeing in this product and why it's valuable and we always look when we have any product (58:17) to find ways to expand that across our portfolio and we're doing some pilots on ways to expand it across our portfolio. But what's important is that it really does fundamentally change the way in which we manufacture a wallboard. And so, it reduces water usage in the manufacturing process by about 25%, which reduces the amount of CO2 emissions, consumed by the drying process. And because it's lighter, it reduces transportation. So, it's really a trifecta of benefits from the way in which we've redesigned this product in this manufacturing process.
UltraLight was very beneficial to contractors, because it's lighter. EcoSmart is beneficial to architects and contractors, because it's sustainable and it's lighter. And we'll continue to find ways to spread the investments and the benefits that we get from our research and development, our customer innovation center across all of our product portfolio in ways that we think expands our value proposition. So, lots of reasons to be excited about this product and I'm glad you asked.
Jennifer F. Scanlon - USG Corp.
All right. So, with that, I want to thank everybody for your interest in USG this morning. And I really want to thank our 6,600 USG employees for the continued efforts that every single one of you is making out there and your dedication to ensuring that we are the leading manufacturer of building products and innovative solutions around the world.
I look forward to next quarter and thank you for your time today.
Ryan Flanagan - USG Corp.
Thanks, Jenny. A taped replay of this call will be available until Friday, May 26. Information is available on usg.com. This concludes our conference call. Thank you.
Operator
Thank you, ladies and gentlemen. This concludes today's conference. Thank you for participating. You may now disconnect.
Copyright policy: All transcripts on this site are the copyright of Seeking Alpha. However, we view them as an important resource for bloggers and journalists, and are excited to contribute to the democratization of financial information on the Internet. (Until now investors have had to pay thousands of dollars in subscription fees for transcripts.) So our reproduction policy is as follows: You may quote up to 400 words of any transcript on the condition that you attribute the transcript to Seeking Alpha and either link to the original transcript or to www.SeekingAlpha.com. All other use is prohibited.
THE INFORMATION CONTAINED HERE IS A TEXTUAL REPRESENTATION OF THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S CONFERENCE CALL, CONFERENCE PRESENTATION OR OTHER AUDIO PRESENTATION, AND WHILE EFFORTS ARE MADE TO PROVIDE AN ACCURATE TRANSCRIPTION, THERE MAY BE MATERIAL ERRORS, OMISSIONS, OR INACCURACIES IN THE REPORTING OF THE SUBSTANCE OF THE AUDIO PRESENTATIONS. IN NO WAY DOES SEEKING ALPHA ASSUME ANY RESPONSIBILITY FOR ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS MADE BASED UPON THE INFORMATION PROVIDED ON THIS WEB SITE OR IN ANY TRANSCRIPT. USERS ARE ADVISED TO REVIEW THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S AUDIO PRESENTATION ITSELF AND THE APPLICABLE COMPANY'S SEC FILINGS BEFORE MAKING ANY INVESTMENT OR OTHER DECISIONS.

If you have any additional questions about our online transcripts, please contact us at: transcripts@seekingalpha.com. Thank you!
About this article:ExpandTagged: Industrial Goods, General Building Materials, TranscriptsError in this transcript? Let us know.Contact us to add your company to our coverage or use transcripts in your business.Learn more about Seeking Alpha transcripts here.Follow SA Transcripts and get email alertsSearch TranscriptThis transcriptFindAll transcriptsFindCompare To:All USG TranscriptsOther Companies in this sector









LEADERS Interview with Jennifer F. Scanlon, President and Chief Executive Officer, USG Corporation
















ONLINE



Home
About

Editorial Policy
Editorial Calendar
Photo Specifications (PDF)


Current Issue
Past Issues
Advertising

Rates and Positions
Closing Dates
Digital Ads
Terms


Contact Us
Reprints (PDF)
BPA(PDF)

Loading


















Jennifer F. Scanlon


A Commitment to Leadership


An Interview with Jennifer F. Scanlon, President and Chief Executive Officer, USG Corporation


Editors’ Note
Jennifer Scanlon became USG Corporation’s President and CEO on November 1, 2016. Previous roles at USG included President of the company’s International and L&W Supply divisions, Senior Vice President, CIO, and Director/Vice President SCM and CRM Strategy for USG. Prior to USG, she was a consultant for Bricker & Associates, Inc. and worked in service delivery for IBM. She earned her M.B.A. in Finance and Marketing from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business and her B.A. in Government and International Relations/Computer Applications from the University of Notre Dame.
Company Brief
USG Corporation (usg.com) is an industry-leading manufacturer of building products and innovative solutions. Headquartered in Chicago, USG serves construction markets around the world through its United States Gypsum Company, USG Interiors, LLC, and international subsidiaries, including its USG Boral Building Products joint venture. USG’s wall, ceiling, flooring, sheathing, and roofing products provide the solutions that enable customers to build the outstanding spaces where people live, work, and play. Its USG Boral Building Products joint venture is a leading plasterboard and ceilings manufacturer across Asia, Australasia, and the Middle East. 
What makes USG special and what has been the key to the company’s success?
USG has been an industry-leading manufacturer of building products and innovative solutions for 115 years. We invented Sheetrock® brand wallboard 100 years ago, which was a breakthrough invention for our company and the building industry. We continue to innovate today, helping our customers in the building industry build smarter, better, and faster. 
I joined this company because USG was an industry leader and, over the past 14 years, my pride and admiration for our company has only grown. What really struck me as interesting, even before I became an employee, was USG’s commitment to our customers and our strong brands, which are backed up by our core values and our people. 
Our number-one core value is safety and we live this every day. Working safely is not just a statement on a poster – it is a value that is addressed every single minute of every single day. For example, at our plants, the first thing that one sees is how many hours it has been since the last lost-time injury. In fact, our Galena Park, Texas, plant just celebrated 10,000 safe workdays – that’s 27 years without a lost-time injury. 
We recently received the National Safety Council’s Robert W. Campbell Award for excellence in environmental, health, and safety programs, which is one of the most prestigious safety recognitions in the United States.
I truly feel that because of our focus on safety, our people listen to each other and they look out for each other. This is a crucial part of USG’s culture and reinforces our commitment to the success of our employees and of our customers.
With the company’s long history, how do you remain innovative, especially at your size and scale?
Innovation has made it possible for us to become who we are today. We have driven some of the most significant developments in building materials over the past 100 years: drywall panels, mineral-fiber acoustic ceiling tiles, and light steel studs for framing are just a few examples. Today, we continue to create meaningful solutions to the challenges faced by our industry, such as labor shortages, time constraints, and water scarcity. 
We foster an innovation-centric culture that encourages and rewards ideas and improvements. Yet, the main focus driving innovation has been the needs of our customers. Our employees are out in the field, listening to our customers and seeing firsthand how products are being used. This gives us an understanding of what customers really care about. That closeness to our customers makes us responsive and allows USG to be an innovation leader.
We have a Corporate Innovation Center outside of Chicago, which is a state-of-the-art research facility where our scientists focus on improving current products and developing new ones. This continues to be a key differentiator for us and helps us serve our customers’ evolving needs.
In attracting talent, what do you tell them about the opportunities this industry offers?
Manufacturing is a rapidly changing field where a variety of skills are needed. An incredible amount of technology and innovative thinking goes into our products. We need talented employees that are skilled in science, technology, engineering, and math to connect with our diverse employee and customer bases. 
We focus on research and development at our innovation center and, in fact, are awarded dozens of patents each year so there is always something fresh and new we are bringing to the market.
What makes it exciting to work at USG is that as we travel around the country or around the world, we can see that our products are part of creating important buildings. For example, we provided the first shaft wall system used in some of the tallest buildings in the U.S. such as the Willis Tower in Chicago and One World Trade Center in New York City. We shipped USG products from the U.S. to Dubai to build the Burj Khalifa. We have been a leader in providing innovative solutions and systems required to create buildings of that scale.
People really identify with that sense of creating something. I think this excitement stems from the fact that our industry contributes to creating the places where people live and work every day. We’re part of it all, and that’s fun. 





USG prides itself on building a world-class workforce, and we make it a priority to have a diverse and inclusive workplace.






How important is brand and brand awareness to USG?
USG is one of the leading brands in the building industry. We also have some of the most recognizable product brands. 
In our industry, we’ve found that the Sheetrock® product brand really resonates with consumers. People know it and it’s an iconic product. When we launched our USG products into Asia, Australia, and the Middle East markets, we found that the Sheetrock® product brand resonated in other countries as well. Additionally, our joint compound “with the green lid” is well-known within our industry. We’re proud that our products are the stamp of excellence for commercial contractors.
How important is diversity and the efforts around making sure you have that type of environment?
Diversity is essential in making sure that we’re including different perspectives with all of the intellect and talent that is out there. The construction industry has evolved a lot since our company was founded. It’s important that our employees are reflective of our customer base so we can better understand and meet their needs. 
We recently received an award by a prominent Chicago organization, Chicago United, for our focus on diversity and inclusion. We’re proud USG has been recognized for our efforts. 
Diversity really is about including people of all ethnicities, genders, talents, and experiences. When we look at the issues that our customers care about – labor shortages, water scarcity, or time management – we think about the science, engineering, and technology that is needed to solve them, and we need to make sure we have people that can solve these problems.
For example, we have a food scientist in our research center that is focused on developing different compositions for the chemistry of our products. We also have another talented scientist who came from the cosmetics industry and some of the work she has done has been extremely helpful in allowing us to think differently about our manufacturing processes. If we weren’t willing to consider a diverse pool of candidates and only hired from within our industry, we would not have had some of our most innovative product breakthroughs.
Will you talk about your views around the responsibility that leading companies have to address broader community needs?
We are truly committed to being good corporate citizens in the communities where we live and work. We always think about how we can better serve our customers, be better corporate citizens, and be the best employer for our people. Corporate engagement in our communities is an essential piece of that.
Supporting the communities we serve is an important part of life at USG. We have a number of means for employees to get involved, and our USG Foundation sets the tone. USG also matches contributions that our employees make in time or money to local nonprofits. 
The foundation focuses on housing, health and human services, and education, and our employees are very engaged and committed to giving back to the local neighborhoods in which they live. 
Is there such a thing as finding a balance between the short-term pressures and making long-term investments for the company?
We are now in a strong financial position, which provides opportunities to invest in our future. It is really important to have a strong and healthy balance sheet to enable us to make wise decisions about investing in our business. This past year, we paid off more than $1.1 billion in debt, and we’re back to having a balance sheet that is at the right leverage ratio for our company. This has reduced our interest expense and provides us the flexibility to invest in growth opportunities.
We’ll continue to evaluate growth opportunities in a disciplined fashion and consider the ways to return capital to shareholders. We are also looking to see how we can round out our portfolio in our core manufacturing business.
Is the dialogue that is taking place around advancement for women the right one?
USG prides itself on building a world-class workforce, and we make it a priority to have a diverse and inclusive workplace. I’m honored to be the first female CEO in USG’s history. I believe there are great opportunities for women at USG and in our industry. Our company has been very involved in programs that encourage more women to pursue or advance their careers in manufacturing and all areas of our business, and I am happy to continue our commitments to STEM (science, technology, engineering, and mathematics) programs.
There is a continued focus on recruiting and retaining women for positions within the STEM fields. I’m very encouraged by the progress out there, but everybody needs to be really clear that the way those opportunities unfold is to be the best candidate that is available. It’s about rolling up one’s sleeves and focusing on those essential skills in an industry – the science and engineering topics, and the math and technology are what open the doors for anyone.
I have seen a lot of progress in diversity in our industry. We recently sold USG’s distribution business, L&W Supply, to ABC Supply, owned by one of the most successful self-made entrepreneurs in the country, Diane Hendricks. She’s leading a terrific company. Also, what goes in the wall right behind our Sheetrock® brand wallboard is insulation and we have Mary Rhinehart leading Johns Manville, who has been a great role model in the industry.
Being in Chicago, I get to see some of the iconic structures that Jeanne Gang of Studio Gang is building and see that she has been recognized for her work. It’s great to follow the many great female architects around the world who are becoming more prominent and earning recognition for what they do.
I’m always fascinated when I travel in Asia and Mexico – our customers are frequently family-owned businesses so the whole family is involved. The husband might be the head of sales and the wife might be the head of marketing or accounting, but they’re in it together. We’re seeing many women take over the leadership helm of these family businesses over time. I find that to be really exciting because they are role models in their local communities.
Do you feel you’ve been able to have a number of different careers within one company?
Absolutely. I initially came to USG for a better work/life balance but I also joined because I knew there would be great opportunities here. At that time, I didn’t even know how many opportunities I would actually have, but that has always been my number-one focus at USG. I wanted to keep learning and keep myself fresh. I made sure that I was contributing in some way, shape, or form that is meaningful to the company. I have always been involved at USG and it’s been terrific.
When young people ask me what advice I have for them, I tell them that at any point in their careers, they have to balance the work opportunities that are presented to them with their family and personal obligations, and their compensation. At any step, they have to feel they have the right balance, although it might never be perfect.
Are you able to enjoy the process and celebrate some of the wins? 
While sometimes I’m big on, “even better next time,” I think it’s important to step back and reflect on our achievements. I have found that employees feel the same way – they want to feel good about the things that have been accomplished and it is fun to celebrate successes. It’s something that I have become better at throughout my career.•
Click Here to Download a PDF of An Interview with Jennifer F. Scanlon, President and Chief Executive Officer, USG Corporation


See other features from LEADERS Magazine's January, February, March 2017 edition













Jennifer F. Scanlon - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Jennifer F. Scanlon
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer at USG Corporation


View Full Profile
Are you Jennifer F. Scanlon? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jennifer F. Scanlon's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jennifer F. Scanlon's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jennifer F. Scanlon's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jennifer F. Scanlon through your network of contacts.
												








Jennifer F. Scanlon's Executive Work History


Current


Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, 
USG Corporation


Past
To view Jennifer F. Scanlon's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
50

 
 


Jennifer F. Scanlon's Biography



Ms. Scanlon has served as our President and Chief Executive Officer since November 2016. Prior thereto she held a variety of positions at USG, including Executive Vice President beginning in March 2016 and President, International beginning in September 2010. She also served as the chairman of the board of USG Boral Building Products from its inception in February 2014 until October 2016 and President of L&W Supply Corporation from July 2015 until its sale to ABC Supply in October 2016. Ms. Scanlon has extensive international experience from her leadership of USG's international joint ventures and broad operational and strategic experience fr ...
(Read More)

			Ms. Scanlon has served as our President and Chief Executive Officer since November 2016. Prior thereto she held a variety of positions at USG, including Executive Vice President beginning in March 2016 and President, International beginning in September 2010. She also served as the chairman of the board of USG Boral Building Products from its inception in February 2014 until October 2016 and President of L&W Supply Corporation from July 2015 until its sale to ABC Supply in October 2016. Ms. Scanlon has extensive international experience from her leadership of USG's international joint ventures and broad operational and strategic experience from her previous assignments at USG and with a management consulting firm that specialized in increasing profits through operational improvement.
		
Source: USG Corporation on 03/30/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jennifer F. Scanlon's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Jennifer F. Scanlon. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jennifer F. Scanlon's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jennifer F. Scanlon's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jennifer F. Scanlon through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Jennifer F. Scanlon


















Jennifer F. Scanlon's Connections (44)





Sign up now to view Jennifer F. Scanlon's 44 connections »









Judith A. Sprieser
Lead Independent Director, The Allstate Corporation









Brendan J. Deely
Board Member, LCI Industries









Thomas A. Burke
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, Modine Manufacturing Company









Matthew Carter
Chief Executive Officer, Inteliquent, Inc.









James S. Metcalf
Former Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, USG Corporation









Gretchen R. Haggerty
Board Member, USG Corporation









Edward M. Bosowski
Chairman of the Board, Continental Building Products, Inc.









Brian A. Kenney
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, GATX Corporation









Michelle M. Warner
Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary, USG Corporation









William C. Foote
Lead Independent Director, Walgreens Boots Alliance, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Michael C. Montgomery
Board Member, NMI Holdings, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

ï¿½ 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993






















Jennifer F. Scanlon - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Jennifer F. Scanlon
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer at USG Corporation


View Full Profile
Are you Jennifer F. Scanlon? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jennifer F. Scanlon's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jennifer F. Scanlon's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jennifer F. Scanlon's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jennifer F. Scanlon through your network of contacts.
												








Jennifer F. Scanlon's Executive Work History


Current


Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, 
USG Corporation


Past
To view Jennifer F. Scanlon's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
50

 
 


Jennifer F. Scanlon's Biography



Ms. Scanlon has served as our President and Chief Executive Officer since November 2016. Prior thereto she held a variety of positions at USG, including Executive Vice President beginning in March 2016 and President, International beginning in September 2010. She also served as the chairman of the board of USG Boral Building Products from its inception in February 2014 until October 2016 and President of L&W Supply Corporation from July 2015 until its sale to ABC Supply in October 2016. Ms. Scanlon has extensive international experience from her leadership of USG's international joint ventures and broad operational and strategic experience fr ...
(Read More)

			Ms. Scanlon has served as our President and Chief Executive Officer since November 2016. Prior thereto she held a variety of positions at USG, including Executive Vice President beginning in March 2016 and President, International beginning in September 2010. She also served as the chairman of the board of USG Boral Building Products from its inception in February 2014 until October 2016 and President of L&W Supply Corporation from July 2015 until its sale to ABC Supply in October 2016. Ms. Scanlon has extensive international experience from her leadership of USG's international joint ventures and broad operational and strategic experience from her previous assignments at USG and with a management consulting firm that specialized in increasing profits through operational improvement.
		
Source: USG Corporation on 03/30/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Jennifer F. Scanlon's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Jennifer F. Scanlon. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Jennifer F. Scanlon's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Jennifer F. Scanlon's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Jennifer F. Scanlon through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Jennifer F. Scanlon


















Jennifer F. Scanlon's Connections (44)





Sign up now to view Jennifer F. Scanlon's 44 connections »









Judith A. Sprieser
Lead Independent Director, The Allstate Corporation









Brendan J. Deely
Board Member, LCI Industries









Thomas A. Burke
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, Modine Manufacturing Company









Matthew Carter
Chief Executive Officer, Inteliquent, Inc.









James S. Metcalf
Former Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, USG Corporation









Gretchen R. Haggerty
Board Member, USG Corporation









Edward M. Bosowski
Chairman of the Board, Continental Building Products, Inc.









Brian A. Kenney
Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, GATX Corporation









Michelle M. Warner
Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary, USG Corporation









William C. Foote
Lead Independent Director, Walgreens Boots Alliance, Inc.








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Carl G. Annessa
EVP and COO, Hornbeck Offshore Services, Inc.









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Michael C. Montgomery
Board Member, NMI Holdings, Inc.












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

ï¿½ 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993















































Diversity of Thought is the Key to Global Competitiveness





















Menu









Log In or Register 


Talent 

Technology & IIoT 

Operations 

Leadership 

Supply Chain 

The Economy 



M&T Show 

Manufacturing Products 



IndustryWeek Best Plants Awards 

IW US 50 Best 

IW US 500 

IW 1000 

Manufacturing Leader of The Week 

Trump and Manufacturing 

Automotive Landscape 

Cloud Computing 

The Connected Enterprise 

Industry Intelligence Market Reports 

Webinars 

White Papers 

Magazine 

Newsletters 

Advertise 




























 




Search 

Log In 

Register 





























Recent




Recent





            Second-Quarter US Growth Rate of 2.6% Underscores Resilience            



Jul 28, 2017 








            GE's Century-Old Locomotive Plant to Cut 575 Jobs to Trim Costs            



Jul 27, 2017 














            How to Deliver on the Promise of Industry 4.0            



Jul 27, 2017 








            Trump Announces Apple Supplier Foxconn Opening US Factory            



Jul 26, 2017 








            How Do I Prepare for Industry 4.0 FAQ            



Jul 26, 2017 






education

Employee Engagement for Manufacturing Report: How to Drive Productivity by Focusing on Your Hourly Employees 



Featured





            How to Set Up a Lean Factory That Works, Part 1            



May 30, 2017 








            Three Steps for Manufacturers to Begin their Digital Transformation            



Jun 28, 2017 








            Top 25 Supply Chains of 2017            



Jun 19, 2017 








            What is World Class Manufacturing and How Do You Measure It?            



Jan 12, 2016 


















 










 


Bill Pugliano/Getty Images



Talent>Recruiting / Retention Diversity of Thought is the Key to Global Competitiveness


    Women are underrepresented in manufacturing, but companies such as USG Corp. see more women in the industry as a key to increased competitiveness.  

Jennifer F. Scanlon, SVP, USG Corp | Jul 16, 2015



































The recent passing of Father Ted Hesburgh, former president of my alma mater University of Notre Dame, got me thinking about his trailblazing wisdom on inclusion as a vehicle for driving progress and competitiveness.
Father Ted was visionary in admitting women to Notre Dame in the 1970s based on his belief that the university could never be great if 50% of the world’s thinkers were excluded. And today, Notre Dame is one of the most prestigious institutions in the country, with almost twice the percentage of female engineers of any university in the country.
It is simple, yet genius. Get a diverse cross section of the population together and you will achieve greater innovation and overall success.
According to a recent article by Sheryl Sandberg and Adam Grant, “If men want to make their work teams successful, one of the best steps they can take is to bring on more women.”
But in manufacturing, women are underrepresented.
“Women represent manufacturing’s largest pool of untapped talent,” says the Manufacturing Institute study, "Untapped Resource: How Manufacturers Can Attract, Retain, and Advance Talented Women." While women make up approximately 50% of the labor force, the number of women in the manufacturing labor force is only 24%, according to the Manufacturing Institute.
That’s why in recent years, the Manufacturing Institute has worked to address this deficit by launching programs like the Science, Technology, Engineering and Production (STEP) Ahead program. The program highlights the role of women in the manufacturing industry through recognition, research and leadership. It also offers best practices for how manufacturers can attract, support, retain and advance women.
At USG, we are actively recruiting and promoting women to take on manufacturing roles, as well as positions in the fields of science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM). We know that these jobs are incubators for innovation, which help us stay competitive and promote future growth in our business.
But for USG it goes beyond recruitment. We also work hard to mentor our employees, reward them, and encourage them to grow in their careers.
Ann Franzen is USG’s first female plant manager and the managing sponsor for USG’s “Women in Manufacturing” (WiM), our employee resource group developed to support female employees.
Ann first joined USG in 1994. “I’ve had some great bosses who have encouraged me to push myself and take on new opportunities,” she says. “But it was challenging to be the only woman in my role and not have female peers to turn to for guidance. That’s part of why I’m so passionate about our WiM group.”
Through recruitment efforts, mentoring opportunities, training and peer networking, WiM works to support female employees and develop them to become future leaders. For example, the group provides each new female engineer with a welcome packet and assigns them a mentor, like 35-year USG veteran Marsha Skinner.
Marsha was a driving force in the creation of our popular Fiberock® product, and today leads the operation that last year produced a record amount of product at the lowest manufacturing cost since start-up more than 15 years ago.
“It has been a challenging experience, and one in which the team has had to overcome many obstacles.” Marsha said. “But I have enjoyed working with a diverse group of employees to solve problems and deliver a one-of-a-kind operation for the company.”
We also employ a number of women who are successful sales and marketing leaders around the world – in places like Uruguay, Mexico, Singapore, Korea, and Lebanon along with the U.S. and Canada. This is important because many of our customers in Asia and South America are family-run businesses, with wives and daughters in charge of sales, marketing and finance.
Ultimately, when we bring different people together, we have better engagement and innovation, which helps us stay competitive in today’s global economy. This helps us meet and exceed our customers’ expectations and our business objectives, and it’s the right thing to do.
Father Ted understood decades ago that women make up half of the potential human capital available in any economy, and the efficient use of this talent pool is a key driver for continued competitiveness. We should all follow his lead, and I’m proud to say that at USG, we are.
Jennifer F. Scanlon is senior vice president and president, International, of USG Corp., a manufacturer of construction materials.


      TAGS:              Companies & Executives Corporate Culture The Economy Competitiveness 


0 comments 


Hide comments

Comment *


More information about text formats
Text format 
CommentsPlain text

CommentsAllowed HTML tags: <em> <strong> <blockquote> <br> <p>Plain textNo HTML tags allowed.Web page addresses and e-mail addresses turn into links automatically.Lines and paragraphs break automatically.

PublishLog in or register to comment






Home page 


Save
 






RelatedIn Honor of Manufacturing Day Let's Vow to Get More Women in the FieldOct 01, 2014Will Things Ever Change for Women in Business and Manufacturing?Apr 09, 2015The Only Manufacturing Skills Shortage That MattersJul 25, 2017BMW Lifer Brings Steady Hand to Shaky Electric-Car Maker FaradayJul 17, 2017 
Load More























































USG Corp. Announces Leadership Transition | officeinsight


















































Search



Toggle navigation












Giving Voice To Those Who Create Workplace Design & Furnishings



View Current Issue







USG Corp. Announces Leadership Transition


		                	October 1st, 2016  / Chicago, IL        	





James S. Metcalf to Retire as Chairman, President and Chief Executive Officer, Effective October 31, 2016
Jennifer F. Scanlon to Succeed Metcalf as President and Chief Executive Officer
Steven F. Leer to Transition to Non-Executive Chairman of the Board
Jennifer F. Scanlon
USG Corporation (NYSE:USG), a leading building products company, today announced that James S. Metcalf will retire as chairman of the board, president and chief executive officer (CEO), effective Oct. 31, 2016. Mr. Metcalf has served as president and chief executive officer since January 2011 and as chairman since December 2011.
Jennifer F. Scanlon, executive vice president, president, International and president, L&W Supply Corporation, will succeed Mr. Metcalf as president and CEO upon his retirement and has been appointed a director of the company, effective immediately. Ms. Scanlon will serve as executive vice president and CEO-elect until Nov. 1, 2016. As part of the leadership transition, Steven F. Leer, lead director, will become non-executive chairman of the board, effective Nov. 1, 2016.
“After more than 35 years with the company and more than a decade in senior leadership roles, including almost six years as president and chief executive officer, I believe that it is the right time for me to move on to the next phase of my professional life and for Jenny to guide USG into its next chapter,” said Mr. Metcalf.
Mr. Metcalf continued, “Together we have executed Our Plan to Win, strengthening and growing our core businesses, diversifying our earnings and differentiating our products and services through innovation. With the announced sale of L&W Supply, a strong balance sheet and a deep, experienced team in place, the company is well prepared for this leadership transition. I have full confidence that Jenny and our management team will continue to provide dynamic leadership to create even greater success for our customers, shareholders and employees.”
“Jenny’s background, skills, and expertise give the board full confidence that she is the right person to serve as the next leader of USG,” said Mr. Leer. “Having served in a variety of positions at USG for almost 14 years, Jenny knows the business intimately and brings great insight to this role. She played a leadership role in developing and executing the company’s strategy, including the establishment of the USG Boral joint venture and in returning L&W Supply to profitability. Jenny’s promotion is a reflection of the board’s long-standing succession planning, and we are pleased to have an executive as qualified as Jenny take the reins and lead USG as it moves into its next phase of growth and value creation. We thank Jim for his outstanding leadership of USG over the years, taking over during challenging market conditions, restoring the company to profitability and putting it on sound financial footing.”
“I am excited to take on the role of president and CEO at USG, an outstanding company with innovative products, dedicated employees, clear growth prospects and a solid financial foundation,” said Ms. Scanlon. “These strengths give me great confidence that we are prepared for the next phase of the company’s future. I look forward to working closely with USG’s executive team and employees across the company. Together, we will build on our significant momentum and deliver value for our shareholders, customers, partners and employees.”
About Jennifer Scanlon
Jennifer Scanlon is executive vice president; president, International, president, L&W Supply Corporation, and CEO-elect. She is also a director on the USG Board of Directors and the chairman of the board of USG Boral Building Products. Scanlon leads USG’s international joint ventures across Asia, Australasia and the Middle East. Her previous assignments at USG include vice president and chief information officer and head of corporate strategy. Scanlon joined USG in 2003 as the director of supply chain and customer relationship strategy.
Prior to USG, Scanlon was a senior vice president for Bricker & Associates, Inc., a management consulting firm that specialized in assisting Fortune 500 organizations dramatically increasing profits through operational improvement. She began her career at IBM, serving in various operational and consulting roles.
Scanlon graduated from the University of Notre Dame in 1988 with a B.A. in government and computer applications. She earned an MBA in finance and marketing from the University of Chicago Booth School of Business in 1992. Scanlon serves on the boards of theChicago Council of Global Affairs and of Shore Community Services, Inc. Scanlon is a member of the Economic Club of Chicago and the Executives’ Club of Chicago.
About Steven Leer
Steven Leer has been a director of USG since June 2005, and lead director since January 2012. He serves as chair of the Governance Committee and a member of its Compensation and Organization Committee. Mr. Leer retired as chairman of Arch Coal, Inc. in 2014 after having served in that position since April 2006. He was also the chief executive officer of Arch Coal, Inc. until April 2012. Mr. Leer is a director of Norfolk Southern Corporation, Cenovus Energy Inc. and Parsons Corporation. He is a former director of the Greater St. Louis Area Boy Scouts of America and the National Association of Manufacturers.
About USG Corporation
USG Corporation is a manufacturer and distributor of innovative, high-performance building systems through its United States Gypsum Company, USG Interiors, LLC, and L&W Supply Corporation subsidiaries and its USG Boral Building Products joint venture. Headquartered in Chicago, USG’s worldwide operations serve the commercial, residential, and repair and remodel construction markets, enabling our customers to build the outstanding spaces where people live, work and play. USG wall, ceiling, exterior sheathing, flooring underlayment and roofing systems provide leading-edge building solutions, while L&W Supply branch locations efficiently stock and deliver building materials throughout the United States. USG Boral Building Products is a leading plasterboard & ceilings joint venture across Asia, Australasia, and the Middle East. For additional information, visit www.usg.com.
 


		 Tags: James S. Metcalf | Jennifer F. Scanlon | Steven F. Leer | USG














Press Release  Please follow these steps to send press releases:

Compose email addressed to pressrelease@officeinsight.com
Put press release text in the body of the email
Attach low resolution JPEG photo (150 dpi)

Upcoming Events



							LEED GreenLearn Panel with Cerami’s Acoustics Expert Robby Deem – Aug. 3 in Washington, DC							Date: 08.03.2017




							METROCON17 Keynote: Sandy Chilewich and Joe Sultan							Date: 08.10.2017 - 08.11.2017




							Join IIDA NY Aug. 10 at Viacom for a Conversation About How Data Drives Workplace Design							Date: 08.10.2017




							Celebrate Frank Lloyd Wright’s 150th Birthday with IFDA Aug. 10							Date: 08.10.2017




							IFDA Event Aug. 21: The Impact & Influence of LIGHT on COLOR							Date: 08.21.2017


View All Upcoming Events



 
 




×











×
Share: USG Corp. Announces Leadership Transition



Please complete the below form. All fields are required.
Who Should We Send This To?Recipient Email  Address:*

And Who Are You?Your Name:*Your Email Address:*

CommentsThis field is for validation purposes and should be left unchanged.

 Send 










This iframe contains the logic required to handle AJAX powered Gravity Forms.
 







 
 





×
Sign In to officeinsight







Username*







Password*





Login 


Forgot Password | Not a Subscriber? 







×
Search officeinsight




Search





 







×




Close 








×
Remove Subaccount


You are about to delete  from your subscription. Please confirm that you want to proceed with this action. All of their information will be removed.

Continue 
 







×
Add Subaccount





Contact Information



First Name





Last Name





Email






Username





 Register Subaccount 











×
Cancel Subscription


We're sorry to see you go! By clicking/tapping on the "Continue" button below you acknowledge that you are permanently closing your account, canceling your subscription and will lose access to all online content available on officeinsight and any downloadable files such as PDFs. This change is permanent and cannot be undone aside from creating a new account.


 Close Window Continue 

 







×




















USG CEO to retire, Jennifer Scanlon will take over Nov. 1	                                             - Manufacturing News -  Crain's Chicago Business






























































































































































































        Friday, July 28, 2017
        





Login
Register
Subscribe






Welcome Guest
Account Settings
Register
Log out









Navigation



Editors’ Picks



Weather



Search





                                             Here's how Four Loko became a thing again 
                                        



                                             Dorms for grown-ups come to Chicago 
                                        



                                             Who's telling the truth about state school funding—Rauner or Dems? 
                                        



                                             When small manufacturers become the bank 
                                        



                                             The doctor will see you now—for $25,000 
                                        






×







                                             How city power players diverted millions in blight-fighting TIF cash to Navy Pier 
                                        



                                             SB 1 is flawed, but it's a necessary step for Illinois schools  
                                        



                                             Here's how Four Loko became a thing again 
                                        



                                             Dorms for grown-ups come to Chicago 
                                        



                                             Who's telling the truth about state school funding—Rauner or Dems? 
                                        









                                             When small manufacturers become the bank 
                                        



                                             The doctor will see you now—for $25,000 
                                        



                                             What the Sun-Times' new owners need most 
                                        



                                             Tour this home on 40 acres in La Porte 
                                        



                                             Best places to buy a home 
                                        










×

                        Weather
                    



×

                  Search
                

























        September 23, 2016
    



Comments




Email



Print







 By:  STAFF REPORTS 

 






        SHARE
        ×


Facebook
Twitter
Text / SMS
LinkedIn
Google +


Email










			
			Jennifer F. Scanlon
		




USG names a new CEO


Building products maker USG today said its current CEO will retire next month, with a company executive taking the top job.James S. Metcalf will retire as chairman, president and CEO of the Chicago-based company on Oct. 31, the company said. He has been CEO since January 2011 and chairman since December 2011.Jennifer F. Scanlon, an executive vice president at USG, president of its international group and of L&W Supply, its $1.5 billion building materials distribution unit, will succeed Metcalf as president and CEO. She has been appointed a director.“I am excited to take on the role of president and CEO at USG, an outstanding company with innovative products, dedicated employees, clear growth prospects and a solid financial foundation,” Scanlon, 49, who joined USG in 2003, said in a statement.The company's stock was up 3.5 percent at 1:15 p.m., trading at $27.15.MORE ON USG:• Drywall maker USG may end dividend dry spell•  Innovators: How USG invented its newest line of drywallScanlon graduated from Notre Dame in 1988 with dual degrees in government and computer applications, then earned an MBA in finance and marketing four years later from the University of Chicago's Booth School of Business. She started at USG in 2003.The CEO-elect—she'll hold that title until Nov. 1—has advocated that the manufacturing industry should recruit more women. A 2013 report by the Washington, D.C.-based Manufacturing Institute found that women comprise only 25 percent of the industry's workforce compared with 47 percent of the overall American workforce. At USG, the company sponsors an employee resource group to support female employees, provides each new female engineer with a welcome packet and assigns her a mentor.In a piece she wrote last year for a trade journal, Scanlon pointed to parallels between the manufacturing industry and Notre Dame President Father Ted Hesburgh, who admitted women to the university in the 1970s.“Father Ted understood decades ago that women make up half of the potential human capital available in any economy, and the efficient use of this talent pool is a key driver for continued competitiveness,” she wrote. “We should all follow his lead, and I'm proud to say that at USG, we are.”“After more than 35 years with the company and more than a decade in senior leadership roles, including almost six years as president and chief executive officer, I believe that it is the right time for me to move on to the next phase of my professional life and for Jenny to guide USG into its next chapter,” Metcalf, 58, said in the statement.Lead director Steven F. Leer will become nonexecutive chairman Nov. 1.USG last month said that it would sell L&W Supply for $670 million.


USG Corp.
Manufacturing
Architecture, Design, Construction



























Today's Crain's
Get our daily roundup of important business news.













                        Read Next
                    





                                Illinois loses huge Foxconn factory to Wisconsin
                            





                                Demand boosts Caterpillar
                            





                                What are Illinois' chances of luring iPhone maker's big factory?
                            




                                
                                FreightCar America names new CEO
                            





















































